incubator/apertium-eng-lvs/dev/nouns.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="tip/s__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="veikšan/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vi/lnis__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņa</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lnim</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lni</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lnī</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lni</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lni</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņa</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lnis</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņu</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņiem</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņus</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņos</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņiem</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņi</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņiem</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļņi</l>
          <r>lnis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="amats"><i>amat</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="apjoms"><i>apjom</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="apsvērums"><i>apsvērum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="apzīmēšana"><i>apzīmēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aspekts"><i>aspekt</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="atdalīšana"><i>atdalīšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atgūšana"><i>atgūšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="attālums"><i>attālum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="augums"><i>augum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="avots"><i>avot</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="barošana"><i>barošan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="baseins"><i>basein</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="beigšana"><i>beigšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="biedrs"><i>biedr</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="blīvums"><i>blīvum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="caurums"><i>caurum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ciemats"><i>ciemat</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cipars"><i>cipar</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="datums"><i>datum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="departaments"><i>departament</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dimants"><i>dimant</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dokuments"><i>dokument</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dzimums"><i>dzimum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ekrāns"><i>ekrān</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ezers"><i>ezer</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="festivāls"><i>festivāl</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fons"><i>fon</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gads"><i>gad</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="galds"><i>gald</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="garums"><i>garum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hokejs"><i>hokej</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="iemesls"><i>iemesl</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ieņemšana"><i>ieņemšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="iespaids"><i>iespaid</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="indivīds"><i>indivīd</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="īpašums"><i>īpašum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="izgatavošana"><i>izgatavošan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izmantošana"><i>izmantošan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izņēmums"><i>izņēmum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="izslēgšana"><i>izslēgšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jēdziens"><i>jēdzien</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kabinets"><i>kabinet</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kanāls"><i>kanāl</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kauls"><i>kaul</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klimats"><i>klimat</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="koeficients"><i>koeficient</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kongress"><i>kongres</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kopums"><i>kopum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="krājums"><i>krājum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kritērijs"><i>kritērij</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kungs"><i>kung</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="laikmets"><i>laikmet</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="laupījums"><i>laupījum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="līdzenums"><i>līdzenum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="līgums"><i>līgum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="loks"><i>lok</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="maisījums"><i>maisījum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="maršrutēšana"><i>maršrutēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="marts"><i>mart</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mehānisms"><i>mehānism</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="metāls"><i>metāl</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="motors"><i>motor</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nams"><i>nam</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="noformējums"><i>noformējum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="noslēgšana"><i>noslēgšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="noteikums"><i>noteikum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="noziegums"><i>noziegum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="orgāns"><i>orgān</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pabeigšana"><i>pabeigšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pamiers"><i>pamier</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pārkāpums"><i>pārkāpum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pasākums"><i>pasākum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="periods"><i>period</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pielietojums"><i>pielietojum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="piesārņojums"><i>piesārņojum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pjedestāls"><i>pjedestāl</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="priekšmets"><i>priekšmet</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="programmēšana"><i>programmēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="punkts"><i>punkt</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="raksts"><i>rakst</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="risinājums"><i>risinājum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sāļums"><i>sāļum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="savienojums"><i>savienojum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skats"><i>skat</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spiediens"><i>spiedien</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stāsts"><i>stāst</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tādejāds"><i>tādejād</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tilts"><i>tilt</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="trops"><i>trop</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uzņēmums"><i>uzņēmum</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uzturēšana"><i>uzturēšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vāks"><i>vāk</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="valdīšana"><i>valdīšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="veikšana"><i>veikšan</i><par n="veikšan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vilciens"><i>vilcien</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vilnis"><i>vi</i><par n="vi/lnis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zirgs"><i>zirg</i><par n="tip/s__n_m"/></e>
